pt-PT: Tamanho da roupa de cama: Beliche; California king; Duplo; King; Queen; Único; Padrão; Twin; Cama de casal extragrande; Outro
ro-RO: Dimensiune lenjerie de pat: Supraetajat; California king; Dublu; King; Queen; De o persoană; Standard; Twin; Twin XL; Altele
pl: Rozmiar pościeli: Piętrowe; Kalifornijskie King Size; Podwójny; Król; Królowa; Singiel; Standard; Dwuosobowy; Podwójne XL; Inne
it: Dimensioni della biancheria da letto: Cuccetta; Kingsize California; Doppio; King; Queen; Singolo; Standard; Twin; Twin XL; Altro
zh-TW: 寢具尺寸: 上下舖; California 特大雙人; 雙倍; 國王; 女王; 單倍; 標準; 雙舵; 雙人特大號; 其他
sv: Sängstorlek: Våningssäng; California king; Dubbel; Kung; Drottning; Enkel; Standard; Tvilling; Twin XL; Övrigt
en: Bedding size: Bunk; California king; Double; King; Queen; Single; Standard; Twin; Twin XL; Other
tr: Yatak Örtüsü Boyutu: Ranza; California king; Çift kişilik; Kral; Kraliçe; Tek; Standart; Twin; Twin XL; Diğer
es: Tamaño de la ropa de cama: Litera; California King; Doble; King; Queen; Individual; Estándar; Doble; Doble XL; Otros
hr-HR: Veličina krevetnine: Na kat; Kalifornijski kraljevski; Za dvije osobe; Kraljevski; Kraljičin; Za jednu osobu; Standardni; Odvojeni kreveti; Posebno veliki odvojeni kreveti; Ostalo
nb: Sengetøystørrelse: Køye; California king; Dobbel; Konge; Dronning; Enkel; Standard; Tvilling; Twin XL; Annet
sk-SK: Veľkosť posteľnej bielizne: Poschodový; Kalifornská kráľovská; Dvojitý; Kráľovský; Kráľovnej; Jeden; Štandardný; Dvojposteľ; Dvojposteľ XL; Iné
bg-BG: Размер на спалното бельо: Двуетажно; California king; Двойно; King; Queen; Единично; Стандартно; Двойно; Twin XL; Други
th: ขนาดเครื่องนอน: สองชั้น; แคลิฟอร์เนียคิงไซส์; แบบคู่; คิงไซส์; ควีนไซส์; แบบเดี่ยว; มาตรฐาน; แบบคู่; ทวิน XL; อื่นๆ
el: Μέγεθος κλινοσκεπασμάτων: Κουκέτα; California King; Διπλό; King; Queen; Μονό; Κανονικό; Διπλό; Δύο μονά XL; Άλλο
zh-CN: 床上用品尺寸: 双层; 加州特大号; 双人; 特大; 大; 单; 标准; 单人; 加大单人; 其他
ja: ベッドサイズ: 二段ベッド; カリフォルニアキング; ダブル; キング; クイーン; シングル; スタンダード; ツイン; ツインXL; その他
cs: Velikost povlečení: Palanda; California king; Dvojité; King; Queen; Jedna funkce; Standardní; Dvojitý; Twin XL; Jiné
vi: Kích cỡ giường: Giường tầng; Vua California; Gấp đôi; Nhà vua; Nữ hoàng; Đơn; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Sinh đôi; XL đôi; Khác
da: Sengetøjsstørrelse: Køje; California King; Dobbelt; King; Queen; Enkelt; Standard; Twin; Twin XL; Andet
ko: 침구 크기: 벙커; 캘리포니아 킹; 더블; 킹; 퀸; 싱글; 표준; 트윈; Twin XL; 기타
hu: Ágynemű mérete: Emeletes ágy; California King; Kétszemélyes; King-size; Queen-size; Egyszemélyes; Normál; Dupla; Dupla XL; Egyéb
sl-SI: Velikost posteljnine: Pograd; Podaljšana velika zakonska; Dvojna; Velika zakonska; Večja zakonska; Enojna; Standardna; Dvojna; Dvojna velika; Druga
fr: Taille des draps: Couchette; Roi de Californie; Double; Roi; Reine; Unique; Standard; Double; Double XL; Autre
fi: Vuodevaatteiden mitat: Kerrossänky; California king; Tupla; King; Queen; Yksittäinen; Tavallinen; Twin; Twin XL; Muu
pt-BR: Tamanho da cama: Beliche; Califórnia king; Duplo; Rei; Rainha; Único; Padrão; Estilo duplo; Twin XL; Outro
de: Bettgröße: Etagenbett; California Kingsize; Doppel; Kingsize; Queensize; Einzel; Standard; Twin; Twin XL; Sonstiges
nl: Beddengoedmaat: Stapelbed; California king; Dubbel; Koning; Koningin; Single; Standaard; Twin; Twin XL; Andere
lt-LT: Patalynės dydis: Dviaukštė; „California King“ dydis; Dvigulė; Karališko dydžio; Karalienės dydžio; Single; Standartinė; Twin; „Twin XL“; Kita
ru: Размер постельной принадлежности: Двухъярусная кровать; Калифорния кинг; Двуспальная; Кинг-сайз; Квин-сайз; Односпальная; Стандартная; Твин; Твин XL; Другое